Rhode Island, session 2025, SB985.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-7-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-7 entitled "Liability
Insurance" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-7-6. Rental vehicle coverage.
(a)(1) For liability assumed under a written contract, coverage shall be provided under the
property damage liability section of an insured’s private passenger automobile insurance policy.
Property damage coverage shall extend to a rented motor vehicle, under ten thousand pounds
(10,000 lbs.), without regard to negligence for a period not to exceed sixty (60) consecutive days.
(2) Coverage under subsection (a)(1) of this section shall apply to the named insured and
driver(s) on the private passenger automobile insurance policy and/or their designee(s), unless the
designee driver is specifically excluded from the policy.
(b) Coverage pursuant to subsection (a) shall apply to all collision and comprehensive type
losses.
(c) Whenever liability is accepted by an insurance company involving an accident that
results in their insured’s causing a total loss of the other party’s vehicle, the at-fault carrier shall
extend coverage for a rental vehicle for not less than an additional seven (7) days after the aggrieved
party receives the total loss property damage check.
(d) Coverage shall be provided for loss of use of the rental motor vehicle; provided, that a
claim for loss of use of a rental vehicle shall be limited to the reasonable time to repair or replace

the rental vehicle, and shall be no less than the daily rental rate set forth in the rental agreement. To
establish loss of use, the rental car company shall demonstrate that the rental vehicle sustained
damage, regardless of fault, requires repair, and will be out of service for the period of time
determined by a Rhode Island licensed auto appraiser or adjuster. In the case of a total loss, loss of
use payments shall be made up until the time the vehicle owner receives the property damage
payment for the total loss. Coverage for loss of use of a rented motor vehicle shall be provided
regardless of fleet utilization.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002651
========
LC002651 - Page 2 of 3